Utah statutes.
49-22-203.   Exclusions from membership in system.
The following employees are not eligible for service credit in this system:
(1)  An employee whose employment status is temporary in nature due to the
nature or the type of work to be performed, provided that:
(a)  if the term of employment exceeds six months and the employee otherwise
qualifies for service credit in this system, the participating employer shall
report and certify to the office that the employee is a regular full-time
employee effective the beginning of the seventh month of employment; and
(b)  if an employee, previously terminated prior to becoming eligible for
service credit in this system, is reemployed within three months of
termination by the same participating employer, the participating employer
shall report and certify to the office that the member is a regular full-time
employee when the total of the periods of employment equals six months and the
employee otherwise qualifies for service credit in this system.
(2) (a)  A current or future employee of an institution of higher education
who holds, or is entitled to hold, under Section 49-22-204, a retirement
annuity contract with the Teachers' Insurance and Annuity Association of
America or with any other public or private system, organization, or company
during any period in which required contributions based on compensation have
been paid on behalf of the employee by the employer.
(b)  The employee, upon cessation of the participating employer contributions,
shall immediately become eligible for service credit in this system.
(3)  An employee serving as an exchange employee from outside the state.
(4)  An employee of the Department of Workforce Services who is covered under
another retirement system allowed under Title 35A, Chapter 4, Employment
Security Act.
